Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-502
Act, purpose.

(1) The purpose of the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act is to allow qualifying nonprofit organizations to conduct lotteries and raffles with gross proceeds not greater than fifteen thousand dollars subject to minimal regulation.

(2) The Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act shall apply to all lotteries and raffles with gross proceeds not greater than fifteen thousand dollars, except for lotteries by the sale of pickle cards conducted in accordance with the Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, lotteries conducted by a county, city, or village in accordance with the Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, and lottery games conducted pursuant to the State Lottery Act.

(3) All such lotteries and raffles shall be played and conducted only by the methods permitted in the Nebraska Small Lottery and Raffle Act. No other form or method shall be authorized or permitted.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 160;

Laws 1991, LB 849, § 53;

Laws 1993, LB 138, § 11;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 6.

Nebraska County and City Lottery Act, see section 9-601.

Nebraska Pickle Card Lottery Act, see section 9-301.

State Lottery Act, see section 9-801.